Hawaii statutes.
[§11-404] Initial determination by
the commission. The commission shall promptly determine, without regard to
chapter 91, to:

(1) Summarily dismiss the complaint;

(2) Investigate further;

(3) Make a preliminary determination; or

(4) Refer the complaint to an appropriate prosecuting
attorney for prosecution under section 11-411. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next